Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1904.   Costs to or against protestor.

(1)  When a protest is sustained administratively or upon administrative or judicial review and the protesting bidder or offeror should have been awarded the contract under the solicitation but is not, the protestor shall be entitled to the following relief as a claim against the state:

(a)  the reasonable costs incurred in connection with the solicitation, including bid preparation and appeal costs; and

(b)  any equitable relief determined to be appropriate by the reviewing administrative or judicial body.

(2)  When a protest is not sustained by a procurement appeals panel, the protestor shall reimburse the issuing procurement unit for expenses incurred in defending the appeal, including personnel costs, attorney fees, other legal costs, expenses incurred by the attorney general's office, the per diem and expenses paid by the issuing procurement unit to witnesses or appeals panel members, and any additional expenses incurred by the staff of the issuing procurement unit who have provided materials and administrative services to the procurement appeals panel for that case.

(3) The provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 7, Part 4, Notice of Claim Against a Governmental Entity or a Government Employee, and Section 63G-7-601 do not apply to actions brought under this chapter by an aggrieved party for equitable relief or reasonable costs incurred in preparing or appealing an unsuccessful bid or offer.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

